en: E200, Sorbic acid
xx: E200
ar: E200, حمض السوربيك
bg: E200, Сорбинова киселина, Сорбинова киселина, транс
ca: E200, àcid sòrbic, acid sorbic
cs: E200, Kyselina sorbová, Kyselina sorbová
da: E200, Sorbinsyre, Sorbinsyre
de: E200, Sorbinsäure, Sorbinsäure, E 200, Parasorbinsäure, Pentadiencarbonsäure
el: E200, Σορβικο οξυ, Σορβικό οξύ
eo: E200, Sorbata acido
es: E200, Ácido sórbico, Sorbatos
et: E200, Sorbiinhape, Sorbiinhape
fa: E200, اسید سربیک
fi: E200, Sorbiinihappo, Sorbiinihappoa
fr: E200, Acide sorbique, C6H8O2, 110-44-1
ga: E200, Aigéad sorbach
he: E200, חומצה סורבית
hi: E200, सोर्बिक अम्ल
hr: E200, sorbinska kiselina
hu: E200, Szorbinsav
id: E200, Asam sorbat
is: E200, sorbic acid
it: E200, Acido sorbico, Acido sorbico, C6H8O2
ja: E200, ソルビン酸
ko: E200, 소르빈산
lt: E200, Sorbo rūgštis, Sorbo rūgštis
lv: E200, Sorbīnskābe, Sorbīnskābe, Pīlādžskābe, C6h8o2, Sorbāti
mt: E200, Aċidu sorbiku, Aċidu sorbiku
nb: E200, Sorbinsyre
nl: E200, Sorbinezuur, Sorbinezuur
nn: E200, sorbinsyre
pl: E200, Kwas sorbowy, Kwas sorbowy, Kwas sorbinowy
pt: E200, Ácido sórbico, Ácido sórbico, Sorbato
ro: E200, Acid sorbic, Acid sorbic
ru: E200, Acid sorbic, sorbic acid, сорбиновая кислота, консервант сорбиновая кислота
sh: E200, Sorbinska kiselina
sk: E200, Kyselina sorbová, Kyselina sorbová
sl: E200, Sorbinska kislina, sorbinska kislina
sr: E200, sorbinska kiselina
sv: E200, Sorbinsyra, Sorbinsyra, E 200, 2\,4-hexadiensyra
th: E200, กรดซอร์บิก
tr: E200, Sorbik asit
uk: E200, Сорбінова кислота
vi: E200, Axit sorbic
zh: E200, 山梨酸

en: E201, Sodium sorbate, sodium (E\,E)-hexa-2\,4-dienoate
xx: E201
bg: E201, Натриев сорбат, натриев (E\,E)-хекса-2\,4-диеноат
cs: E201, Sodný sorbát, sodný (E\,E)-hexa-2\,4-dienoát
da: E201, Natriumsorbat, natrium (E\,E)-hexa-2\,4-dienoat
de: E201, Natriumsorbat, Natrium (E\,E)-hexa-2\,4-dienoat
el: E201, Σορβικό νάτριο, νάτριο (E\,E)-εξα-2\,4-διενοικό
es: E201, Sorbato de sodio, Conservante E 201, Sorbato sodico, E-201, Conservante E201, sodio (E\,E)-hexa-2\,4-dienoatoes
et: E201, Naatriumsorbaat, naatrium (E\,E)-heksa-2\,4-dienoaat
fi: E201, Natriumsorbaatti, natrium (E\,E)-heksa-2\,4-dienoaatti
fr: E201, Sorbate de sodium, sodium (E\,E)-hexa-2\,4-dienoate
hu: E201, Nátrium-szorbát, nátrium (E\,E)-hexa-2\,4-dienoát
it: E201, Sorbato di sodio, sodio (E\,E)-esa-2\,4-dienoato
lt: E201, Natrio sorbatas, natrio (E\,E)-heksa-2\,4-dienoatas
lv: E201, Nātrija sorbāts, nātrijs (E\,E)-heksa-2\,4-dienoāts
mt: E201, Sorbat tas-sodju, sodju (E\,E)-esa-2\,4-dienoat
nl: E201, Natriumsorbaat, natrium (E\,E)-hexa-2\,4-dienoaat
pl: E201, Sorbinian sodu, sodu (E\,E)-heksa-2\,4-dienoan
pt: E201, Sorbato de sódio, sódio (E\,E)-hexa-2\,4-dienoato
ro: E201, Sorbat de sodiu, sodiu (E\,E)-hexa-2\,4-dienoat
sk: E201, Sórbát sodný, sodný (E\,E)-hexa-2\,4-dienoát
sl: E201, Natrijev sorbat, natrijev (E\,E)-heksa-2\,4-dienoat
sv: E201, Natriumsorbat, natrium (E\,E)-hexa-2\,4-dienoat

en: E202, Potassium sorbate
xx: E202, 1k202
bg: E202, Калиев сорбат
bs: E202, Kalij sorbat
ca: E202, Sorbat de potassi, sorbat potàssic
cs: E202, Sorban draselný
da: E202, Kaliumsorbat
de: E202, Kaliumsorbat
el: E202, Σορβικο καλιο
eo: E202, Kalia sorbato
es: E202, Sorbato potásico, Sorbato de potasio, potasio sorbato
et: E202, Kaaliumsorbaat
fa: E202, پتاسیم سوربات
fi: E202, Kaliumsorbaatti, Kaliumsorbaattia
fr: E202, Sorbate de potassium
he: E202, אשלגן סורבט
hr: E202, kalijev sorbat
hu: E202, Kálium-szorbát
is: E202, Kalíumsorbat
it: E202, Sorbato di potassio, potassio sorbato
ja: E202, ソルビン酸カリウム, ソルビン酸K, ソルビン酸Ｋ
lt: E202, Kalio sorbatas
lv: E202, Kālija sorbāts
mt: E202, Sorbat tal-potassju
nb: E202, Kaliumsorbat
nl: E202, Kaliumsorbaat
nn: E202, kaliumsorbat
pl: E202, Sorbinian potasu
pt: E202, Sorbato de potássio
ro: E202, Sorbat de potasiu
ru: E202, Сорбат калия
sk: E202, Sorban draselný
sl: E202, Kalijev sorbat
sr: E202, kalijum-sorbat, kalijum sorbat
sv: E202, Kaliumsorbat
tr: E202, Potasyum sorbat, Sorbik asit potasyum tuzu
uk: E202, Сорбат калію
vi: E202, Kali Sorbate
zh: E202, 山梨酸钾

en: E203, Calcium sorbate
xx: E203
ar: E203, سوربات الكالسيوم
bg: E203, Калциев сорбат
ca: E203, Sorbat de calci
cs: E203, Sorban vápenatý
da: E203, Calciumsorbat
de: E203, Calciumsorbat
el: E203, Σορβικο ασβεστιο
es: E203, Sorbato cálcico
et: E203, Kaltsiumsorbaat
fa: E203, کلسیم سوربات
fi: E203, Kalsiumsorbaatti, Kalsiumsorbaattia
fr: E203, Sorbate de calcium
hr: E203, kalcijev sorbat, kalijum sorbat
hu: E203, Kalcium-szorbát
it: E203, Sorbato di calcio
ja: E203, ソルビン酸カルシウム, ソルビン酸Ca, ソルビン酸Ｃａ
lt: E203, Kalcio sorbatas
lv: E203, Kalcija sorbāts
mt: E203, Sorbat tal-kalċju
nl: E203, Calciumsorbaat
pl: E203, Sorbinian wapnia
pt: E203, Sorbato de cálcio
ro: E203, Sorbat de calciu
sh: E203, Kalcijum sorbat
sk: E203, Sorban vápenatý
sl: E203, Kalcijev sorbat
sr: E203, Kalcijum sorbat
sv: E203, Kalciumsorbat
ta: E203, கால்சியம் சார்பேட்டு
vi: E203, Canxi sorbat

en: E209, Heptylparaben
xx: E209
bg: E209, Хептилпарабен
cs: E209, Heptylparaben
da: E209, Heptylparaben
de: E209, Heptylparaben
el: E209, Επτυλπαραβένιο
es: E209, Heptilparabeno
et: E209, Heptüülparabeen
fi: E209, Heptyyliparabeeni, Heptyyliparabeeniä
fr: E209, Hydroxybenzoate d'hépthyle, Heptylparabène
hu: E209, Heptilparabén, Heptil-parabén
it: E209, Eptilparaben
lt: E209, Heptilparabenas
lv: E209, Heptilparabēns
mt: E209, Heptilparaben
nl: E209, Heptylparabeen
pl: E209, P-hydroksybenzoesan heptylu, Heptyloparaben
pt: E209, Heptilparabeno
ro: E209, Heptilparaben
sk: E209, Heptylparaben
sl: E209, Heptilparaben
sv: E209, Heptylparaben

en: E210, Benzoic acid
xx: E210
bg: E210, Бензоена киселина, Бензенова киселина, Бензоат
ca: E210, Àcid benzoic, acid benzoic
cs: E210, Kyselina benzoová, E 210
da: E210, Benzoesyre
de: E210, Benzoesäure, Benzolcarbonsäure, Phenylameisensäure, E 210, Benzoat, Benzencarbonsäure
el: E210, Βενζοϊκο οξυ
es: E210, Ácido benzoico, Conservante E210, Conservante E 210, E 210, Ácido bencenocarboxílico
et: E210, Bensoehape, Bensonaat, Benseenhape, E 210
fi: E210, Bentsoehappo, Bentsoaatti, Bentseenikarboksyylihappo, Fenyylikarboksyylihappo, Bentsoehappoa, Bentsoaattia, Bentseenikarboksyylihappoa, Fenyylikarboksyylihappoa
fr: E210, Acide benzoïque, 65-85-0, C6H5COOH
hu: E210, Benzoesav
it: E210, Acido benzoico, Carbossibenzene, Acido benzencarbossilico, Benzoato, C7H6O2, Acido fenil carbossilico, Acido benzenmetanoico
lt: E210, Benzenkarboksirūgštis
lv: E210, Benzoskābe, C7h6o2, C6h5cooh
mt: E210, Aċidu benżoiku
nl: E210, Benzoëzuur, 65-85-0, Benzeencarbonzuur
pl: E210, Kwas benzoesowy
pt: E210, Ácido benzóico, Benzoato
ro: E210, Acid benzoic
sk: E210, Kyselina benzoová, Kyselina fenylmravčia, Kyselina benzénkarboxylová
sl: E210, Benzojska kislina
sv: E210, Bensoesyra, Bensoat, Bensoater, E 210

en: E211, Sodium benzoate
xx: E211
ar: E211, بنزوات الصوديوم
bg: E211, Натриев бензоат
bs: E211, Natrijum benzoat
ca: E211, Benzoat de sodi
cs: E211, Benzoan sodný, Benzoát sodný, Sodná sůl kyseliny benzenkarboxylové, Benzenkarboxylát sodný, Sodná sůl kyseliny benzoové
da: E211, Natriumbenzoat
de: E211, Natriumbenzoat, Antimol
el: E211, Βενζοϊκο νατριο
eo: E211, natria benzoato
es: E211, Benzoato sódico, Benzoato de sodio, Conservante E 211, Conservante E211, Benzoato de sosa
et: E211, Naatriumbensoaat
fa: E211, سدیم بنزوئیک اسید
fi: E211, Natriumbentsoaatti, Natriumbentsoaattia
fr: E211, Benzoate de sodium, conservateur e211
he: E211, סודיום בנזואט
hr: E211, konzervans natrijev benzoat, natrijev benzoat, Na-benzoat
hu: E211, Nátrium-benzoát
id: E211, Natrium benzoat
is: E211, Natríumbensóat
it: E211, Benzoato di sodio, C6H5COONa
lt: E211, Natrio benzoatas
lv: E211, Nātrija benzoāts
mt: E211, Benżoat tas-sodju
nb: E211, Natriumbenzoat
nl: E211, Natriumbenzoaat
pl: E211, Benzoesan sodu
pt: E211, Benzoato de sódio
ro: E211, Benzoat de sodiu
ru: E211, Бензоат натрия, консервант бензоат натрия
sh: E211, Natrijum-benzoat
sk: E211, Benzoan sodný
sl: E211, Natrijev benzoat
sr: E211, натријум-бензоат
sv: E211, Natriumbensoat
tr: E211, Sodyum Benzoat
vi: E211, natri benzoat
zh: E211, 苯甲酸钠

en: E212, Potassium benzoate
xx: E212
bg: E212, Калиев бензоат
ca: E212, Benzoat de potassi
cs: E212, Benzoan draselný, Benzoát draselný, Benzenkarboxylát draselný, E 212
da: E212, Kaliumbenzoat
de: E212, Kaliumbenzoat, Kaliumbenzoat, Kalisalz der Benzencarbonsäure, E 212
el: E212, Βενζοϊκο καλιο
es: E212, Benzoato potásico, Benzoato de potasio, E 212
et: E212, Kaaliumbensoaat
fi: E212, Kaliumbentsoaatti, Kaliumbentsoaattia
fr: E212, Benzoate de potassium, C7H5KO2, KC7H5O2, E 212, 582-25-2
hu: E212, Kálium-benzoát
it: E212, Benzoato di potassio
lt: E212, Kalio benzoatas
lv: E212, Kālija benzoāts, Kālija benzoāts, benzolkarbonskābes kālija sāls
mt: E212, Benżoat tal-potassju
nl: E212, Kaliumbenzoaat
pl: E212, Benzoesan potasu
pt: E212, Benzoato de potássio
ro: E212, Benzoat de potasiu
sk: E212, Benzoan draselný
sl: E212, Kalijev benzoat
sv: E212, Kaliumbensoat, E 212

en: E213, Calcium benzoate
xx: E213
bg: E213, Калциев бензоат
ca: E213, Benzoat de calci
cs: E213, Benzoát vápenatý, E 213, Benzoan vápenatý, Calcium benzoate
da: E213, Calciumbenzoat
de: E213, Calciumbenzoat, E 213
el: E213, Βενζοϊκο ασβεστιο
es: E213, Benzoato cálcico, Benzoato de calcio, E 213
et: E213, Kaltsiumbensoaat
fi: E213, Kalsiumbentsoaatti, Kalsiumbentsoaattia
fr: E213, Benzoate de calcium
hu: E213, Kalcium-benzoát
it: E213, Benzoato di calcio
lt: E213, Kalcio benzoatas
lv: E213, Kalcija benzoāts
mt: E213, Benżoat tal-kalċju
nl: E213, Calciumbenzoaat
pl: E213, Benzoesan wapnia
pt: E213, Benzoato de cálcio
ro: E213, Benzoat de calciu
sk: E213, Benzoan vápenatý
sl: E213, Kalcijev benzoat
sv: E213, Kalciumbensoat, E 213

en: E214, Ethyl p-hydroxybenzoate, Ethylparaben, ethyl para-hydroxybenzoate
xx: E214
bg: E214, Етилов р-хидроксибензоат, Етилпарабен
cs: E214, Ethyl p-hydroxybenzoát
da: E214, Ethyl-p-hydroxybenzoat, Ethylparaben
de: E214, Phb-ester (ethyl-p-hydroxybenzoat), Ethylparaben, 4-Hydroxybenzoesäureethylester
el: E214, P-υδροξυβενζοϊκος αιθυλεστερας, Ethylparaben
es: E214, P-hidroxibenzoato de etilo, Etilparabeno, Para-hidroxibenzoato de etilo
et: E214, Etüül-p-hüdroksübensoaat, Etüülparabeen
fi: E214, Etyyli-p-hydroksibentsoaatti, Etyyliparabeeni, Etyyli-p-hydroksibentsoaattia, Etyyliparabeeniä
fr: E214, 4-hydroxybenzoate d'éthyle, éthylparabène, P-hydroxybenzoate d'éthyle
hu: E214, Etil-p-hidroxi-benzoát, etilparabén, Etil-parahidroxibenzoát
it: E214, P-idrossibenzoato d'etile, Etilparabene, Etilparaben
lt: E214, Etilo p-hidroksibenzoatas, Etilparabenas
lv: E214, Etil-p-hidroksibenzoāts, Etilparabens
mt: E214, P-idrossibenżoat tal-etil, Etilparaben
nl: E214, Ethyl-p-hydroxybenzoaat, Ethylparaben
pl: E214, P-hydroksybenzoesan etylu, Etyloparaben
pt: E214, P-hidroxibenzoato de etilo, Etilparabeno
ro: E214, P-hidroxibenzoat de etil, Etil paraben
sk: E214, Etyl-p-hydroxybenzoát, Etylparabén
sl: E214, Etil parahidroksi benzoat, etilparaben
sv: E214, P-hydroxibensoesyraetylester, Etylparaben

en: E215, Sodium ethyl p-hydroxybenzoate, Sodium ethyl p-hydroxybenzoate
xx: E215
bg: E215, Натриев етил р-хидроксибензоат, Натриев етил р-хидроксибензоат
cs: E215, Ethyl-p-hydroxybenzoát sodná sůl
da: E215, Ethyl-p-hydroxybenzoat natriumsalt, Natriumethyl-p-hydroxybenzoat
de: E215, Phb-ethylester-natriumsalz (natriumethyl-p-hydroxybenzoat), Natriumethyl-p-hydroxybenzoat
el: E215, P-υδροξυβενζοϊκος αιθυλεστερας αλασ με νατριο
es: E215, P-hidroxibenzoato sódico de etilo
et: E215, Naatriumetüül-p-hüdroksübensoaat
fi: E215, Natriumetyyli-p-hydroksibentsoaatti, Natriumetyyli-p-hydroksibentsoaattia
fr: E215, Dérivé sodique du 4-hydroxybenzoate d'éthyle, Éthyl p-hydroxybenzoate de sodium
hu: E215, Nátrium-etil-p-hidroxi-benzoát
it: E215, Etil-p-idrossibenzoato di sodio
lt: E215, Natrio etilo p–hidroksibenzoatas
lv: E215, Nātrija etil-p-hidroksibenzoāts
mt: E215, Etil p-idrossibenżoat tas-sodju
nl: E215, Ethyl-p-hydroxybenzoaat natriumzout
pl: E215, Sól sodowa p-hydroksybenzoesanu etylu
pt: E215, Sal sódico do p-hidroxibenzoato de etilo
ro: E215, Sarea de sodiu a p-hidroxibenzoatului de etil
sk: E215, Nátrium-etyl-p-hydroxybenzoát, etyl-p-hydroxybenzoan sodný
sl: E215, Natrijev etil parahidroksi benzoat
sv: E215, P-hydroxibensoesyraetylesterns natriumsalt

en: E216, Propyl para-hydroxybenzoate, Sodium Salt of Propyl-p-hydroxy Benzoic Acid, Propylparaben, propyl paraben
xx: E216
ar: E216, بروبيل بارا هيدروكسي بنزوات
az: E216, Propil para-hidroksibenzoat
bg: E216, Пропил пара-хидроксибензоат
ca: E216, Propil parahidroxibenzoat
cs: E216, Propylparaben
da: E216, Propylparaben
de: E216, 4-Hydroxybenzoesäurepropylester
el: E216, Προπυλ παραϋδροξυβενζοϊκός
es: E216, Propil parahidroxibenzoato
et: E216, Propüülparabeen
fi: E216, Propyyli-p-hydroksibentsoaatti, Propyyliparabeeni, Propyyli-p-hydroksibentsoaattia, Propyyliparabeeniä
fr: E216, 4-hydroxybenzoate de propyle, propylparabène, Sel sodique de l'acide p-hydroxypropyl, Sodium Salt of Propyl-p-hydroxy Benzoic Acid, Propylparabène de sodium, ρ-oxybenzoate de propyl sodique, ρ-hydroxybenzoate de propyle sodique, P-hydroxybenzoate de propyle, Parahydroxybenzoate de propyle, Para-hydroxybenzoate de propyle, Propylparaben
he: E216, פרופיל пара-הידרוקסיבנזואט
hu: E216, Propil-para-hidroxibenzoát
id: E216, Propil para-hidroksibenzoat
it: E216, Propilparaben
ja: E216, プロピルパラヒドロキシベンゾアート
ko: E216, 프로필 파라-하이드록시벤조에이트
lt: E216, Propilparahidroksibenzoatas
lv: E216, Propilparahidroksibenzoāts
mk: E216, Пропил пара-хидроксибензоат
ms: E216, Propil para-hidroksibenzoat
nl: E216, Propyl-p-hydroxybenzoaat
pl: E216, Paraben propylu
pt: E216, Propilparabeno
ro: E216, Propil para-hidroxibenzoat
ru: E216, Пропил пара-гидроксибензоат
sk: E216, Propylparaben
sl: E216, Propil parahidroksibenzoat
sv: E216, Propylparaben
th: E216, โพรพิล พารา-ไฮดรอกซีเบนโซเอต
tr: E216, Propil para-hidroksibenzoat
uk: E216, Пропіл пара-гідроксибензоат
vi: E216, Propyl para-hydroxybenzoate
zh: E216, 羟苯丙酯

en: E217, Sodium propyl para-hydroxybenzoate
xx: E217
bg: E217, Натриев пропил п-хидроксибензоат
cs: E217, Sodná sůl propyl-p-hydroxybenzoátu
da: E217, Natriumpropyl-p-hydroxybenzoat
de: E217, Natriumpropyl-p-hydroxybenzoat
el: E217, Νάτριο προπυλο π-υδροξυβενζοϊκο
es: E217, Propil parahidroxibenzoato sódico
et: E217, Naatriumpropüül-p-hüdroksübensoaat
fi: E217, Natriumpropyyli-p-hydroksibentsoaatti, Natriumpropyyli-p-hydroksibentsoaattia
fr: E217, Dérivé sodique du 4-hydroxybenzoate de propyle, Sel sodique du 4-hydroxybenzoate de propyle
hu: E217, Nátrium-propil-para-hidroxibenzoát
it: E217, Sodio propil p-idrossibenzoato
lt: E217, Natrio propilo p–hidroksibenzoatas
lv: E217, Nātrija propil-p-hidroksibenzoāts
mt: E217, Natriju propil p-idrossibenżoat
nl: E217, Natriumpropyl-p-hydroxybenzoaat
pl: E217, Sól sodowa p-hydroksybenzoesanu propylu
pt: E217, P-hidroxibenzoato de propilo sódico
ro: E217, Sarea de sodiu a p-hidroxibenzoatului de propil
sk: E217, Sodná soľ propyl-p-hydroxybenzoátu
sl: E217, Natrijev propil parahidroksi benzoat
sv: E217, Natriumpropyl-p-hydroxybensoat

en: E218, Methyl p-hydroxybenzoate, Methylparaben, methyl 4-hydroxybenzoate, methyl paraben
xx: E218
bg: E218, Метил р-хидроксибензоат, Метилпарабен
cs: E218, Methyl-p-hydroxybenzoát, Metylparaben
da: E218, Methyl-p-hydroxybenzoat, Methylparaben
de: E218, Phb-methylester (methyl-p-hydroxybenzoat), Methylparaben, 4-Hydroxybenzoesäuremethylester
el: E218, P-υδροξυβενζοϊκος μεθυλεστερας
es: E218, P-hydroxibenzoato de metilo, Metilparabeno, Metil p-hidroxibenzoato
et: E218, Metüül-p-hüdroksübensoaat, Metüülparabeen
fi: E218, Metyyli-p-hydroksibentsoaatti, Metyyliparabeeni, Metyyli-p-hydroksibentsoaattia, Metyyliparabeeniä
fr: E218, 4-hydroxybenzoate de méthyle, méthylparabène, P-hydroxybenzoate de méthyle
hu: E218, Metil-p-hidroxi-benzoát, Metilparabén, Metil-parahidroxibenzoát
it: E218, P-idrossibenzoato di metile, Metilparabene, Metilparaben
lt: E218, Metilo p-hidroksibenzoatas, Metilparabenas
lv: E218, Metil-p-hidroksibenzoāts, Metilparabens
mt: E218, P-idrossibenżoat tal-metil, Metilparaben
nl: E218, Methyl-p-hydroxybenzoaat, Methylparaben, methylparabeen
pl: E218, P-hydroksybenzoesan metylu, Metyloparaben
pt: E218, P-hidroxibenzoato de metilo, Metilparabeno
ro: E218, P-hidroxibenzoat de metil, Metil paraben
sk: E218, Metyl-p-hydroxybenzoát, Metylparabén
sl: E218, Metil parahidroksi benzoat, metilparaben
sv: E218, P-hydroxibensoesyrametylester, Metylparaben

en: E219, Sodium methyl p-hydroxybenzoate, sodium methylparaben
xx: E219
bg: E219, Натриев метил р-хидроксибензоат
cs: E219, Methyl-p-hydroxybenzoát sodná sůl
da: E219, Methyl-p-hydroxybenzoat natriumsalt, Natriummethyl-p-hydroxybenzoat
de: E219, Phb-methylester-natriumsalz (natriummethyl-p-hydroxybenzoat), Natriummethyl-p-hydroxybenzoat
el: E219, P-υδροξυβενζοϊκος μεθυλεστερας αλας με νατριο
es: E219, P-hidroxibenzoato sódico de metilo
et: E219, Naatriummetüül-p-hüdroksübensoaat
fi: E219, Natriummetyyli-p-hydroksibentsoaatti, Natriummetyyliparabeeni, Natriummetyyli-p-hydroksibentsoaattia, Natriummetyyliparabeeniä
fr: E219, Dérivé sodique du 4-hydroxybenzoate de méthyle, Méthyl p-hydroxybenzoate de sodium
hu: E219, Nátrium-metil-p-hidroxi-benzoát
it: E219, Metil-p-idrossibenzoato di sodio, Sodio metilparaben, C8H7NaO3, Solparol, Preserval MS, Sodio 4-(metossicarbonil)fenolato, Sodio 4-carbometossifenolato, Sodio metil p-idrossibenzoato, Sodio p-metossicarbonilfenossido, Sale sodico del 4-idrossibenzoato di metile, Nipagina sodica
lt: E219, Natrio metilo p–hidroksibenzoatas
lv: E219, Nātrija metil-p-hidroksibenzoāts
mt: E219, Metil p-idrossibenżoat tas-sodju
nl: E219, Methyl-p-hydroxybenzoaat natriumzout
pl: E219, Sól sodowa p-hydroksybenzoesanu metylu
pt: E219, Sal sódico do p-hidroxibenzoato de metilo
ro: E219, Sarea de sodiu a p-hidroxibenzoatului de metil
sk: E219, Nátrium-metyl-p-hydroxybenzoát, Nátrium-metyl-p-hydroxybenzoát
sl: E219, Natrijev metil parahidroksi benzoat
sv: E219, P-hydroxibensoesyrametylesterns natriumsalt

en: E220, Sulphur dioxide, Sulfur dioxide
xx: E220
ar: ثنائي أكسيد الكبريت
az: Kükürd qazından təmizlənmə üsulları
bg: E220, Серен двуокис, Серен диоксид
bn: সালফার ডাইঅক্সাইড
bs: Sumpor dioksid
ca: E220, Diòxid de sofre, dioxid de sofre
cs: E220, Oxid siřičitý, Oxid siřičitý
cy: Sylffwr deuocsid
da: E220, Svovldioxid, Svovldioxid
de: E220, Schwefeldioxid, Schwefeldioxid
el: E220, Διοξειδιο του θειου, Διοξείδιο του θείου
eo: sulfura dioksido
es: E220, Dióxido de azufre, Anhídrido sulfuroso
et: E220, Vääveldioksiid, Vääveldioksiid
fa: گوگرد دی‌اکسید
fi: E220, Rikkidioksidi, Rikkidioksidia
fr: E220, Anhydride sulfureux, Dioxyde de soufre
ga: dé-ocsaíd sulfair
he: גופרית דו-חמצנית
hi: सल्फर डाइआक्साइड
hr: E220, sumporni dioksid, sumpornog dioksida
hu: E220, Kén-dioxid
hy: Ծծմբի օքսիդ
id: Belerang dioksida
is: Brennisteinsoxíð
it: E220, Anidride solforosa, Biossido di zolfo
ja: E220, 二酸化硫黄
kk: Күкірт диоксиді
ko: 이산화 황
ky: Күкүрттүү ангидрид
lt: E220, Sieros dioksidas, Sieros dioksidas
lv: E220, Sēra dioksīds, Sēra dioksīds
mk: Сулфур диоксид
ml: സൾഫർ ഡയോക്‌സൈഡ്
mr: सल्फर डायॉक्साईड
ms: Sulfur dioksida
mt: E220, Diossidu tal-kubrit, Diossidu tal-kubrit
nb: svoveldioksid
nl: E220, Zwaveldioxide, Zwaveldioxide
pl: E220, Dwutlenek siarki, Dwutlenek siarki, SO2
pt: E220, Dióxido de enxofre, Dióxido de enxofre
ro: E220, Dioxid de sulf, Dioxid de sulf
ru: E220, серный диоксид, диоксид серы
sh: Sumpor dioksid
sk: E220, Oxid siričitý, Oxid siričitý
sl: E220, Žveplov dioksid, žveplov dioksid
sr: сумпор-диоксид
su: Walirang dioksida
sv: E220, Svaveldioxid, Svaveldioxid
ta: கந்தக டைஆக்சைடு
th: ซัลเฟอร์ไดออกไซด์
tr: kükürt dioksit
uk: Діоксид сірки
vi: Lưu huỳnh điôxit
zh: 二氧化硫

en: E221, Sodium sulphite, Sodium sulfite
xx: E221
ar: E221, كبريتيت الصوديوم
bg: E221, Натриев сулфит
ca: E221, Sulfit de sodi, sulfit sòdic
cs: E221, Siřičitan sodný
da: E221, Natriumsulfit
de: E221, Natriumsulfit
el: E221, Θειωδες νατριο
eo: E221, Natria sulfito
es: E221, Sulfito sódico, Sulfito de sodio, Conservante E 221, Conservante E221
et: E221, Naatriumsulfit
fa: E221, سدیم سولفیت
fi: E221, Natriumsulfiitti, Natriumsulfiittia
fr: E221, Sulfite de sodium, Sulfite de soude
hu: E221, Nátrium-szulfit
hy: E221, Նատրիումի սուլֆիտ
it: E221, Solfito di sodio, Solfito sodico
ja: E221, 亜硫酸ナトリウム, 亜硫酸Na, 亜硫酸Ｎａ
ky: E221, Натрий сульфити
lt: E221, Natrio sulfitas
lv: E221, Nātrija sulfīts
mt: E221, Sulfit tas-sodju
nl: E221, Natriumsulfiet
pl: E221, Siarczyn sodu, Siarczyn sodowy, Siarczan(IV) sodu
pt: E221, Sulfito de sódio
ro: E221, Sulfit de sodiu
ru: E221, сульфит натрия
sh: E221, Natrijum sulfit
sk: E221, Siričitan sodný
sl: E221, Natrijev sulfit
sr: E221, Natrijum sulfit
sv: E221, Natriumsulfit
th: E221, โซเดียมซัลไฟต์
tr: E221, Sodyum sülfit
uk: E221, Сульфіт натрію
vi: E221, Natri sunfit
zh: E221, 亚硫酸钠

en: E222, Sodium bisulphite, Sodium bisulfite
xx: E222
az: E222, Natrium bisulfit
bg: E222, Натриев бисулфит, Натриев бисулфит
ca: E222, Bisulfit de sodi, sulfit àcid de sodi
cs: E222, Hydrogensiřičitan sodný, Hydrogensiřičitan sodný, NaHSO3, E 222, Kyselý siřičitan sodný, Hydrosulfit
da: E222, Natriumhydrogensulfit, Natriumbisulfit
de: E222, Natriumhydrogensulfit, Natriumbisulfit, NaHSO3, E 222
el: E222, Οξινο θειωδες νατριο
eo: E222, Natria bisulfito
es: E222, Sulfito ácido de sodio, Bisulfito de sodio, Bisulfito sódico, Hidrogeno sulfito sódico, E 222
et: E222, Naatriumvesiniksulfit
fa: E222, سدیم بی‌سولفیت
fi: E222, Natriumvetysulfiitti, Natriumbisulfiitti, Natriumvetysulfiittia, Natriumbisulfiittia
fr: E222, Bisulfite de sodium, Sulfite acide de sodium, NaHSO3, Bisulfite de soude, Hydrogénosulfite de sodium
he: E222, ביסולפיט
hr: E222, Natrijev bisulfit
hu: E222, Nátrium-hidrogén-szulfit, Nátrium-biszulfit
hy: E222, Նատրիումի հիդրոսուլֆիտ
it: E222, Sodio bisolfito, Bisolfito di sodio, Idrogenosolfito di sodio
ja: E222, 亜硫酸水素ナトリウム
lt: E222, Natrio bisulfitas, Natrio bisulfitas
lv: E222, Nātrija bisulfīts, Nātrija bisulfīts
mt: E222, Bisulfit tas-sodju, Bisulfit tas-sodju
nl: E222, Natriumwaterstofsulfiet, Natriumwaterstofsulfiet, Natriumbisulfiet
pl: E222, Wodorosiarczyn sodu, Kwaśny siarczyn sodu, Siarczyn sodowo-wodorowy, Wodorosiarczan(IV) sodu
pt: E222, Hidrogenossulfito de sódio, Bissulfito de sódio, Hidrogenosulfito de sódio
ro: E222, Bisulfit de sodiu, Bisulfit de sodiu
sh: E222, Natrijum bisulfit
sk: E222, Hydrogensiričitan sodný
sl: E222, Natrijev bisulfit, natrijev bisulfit
sr: E222, Natrijum bisulfit
sv: E222, Natriumvätesulfit, Natriumvätesulfit
tr: E222, Sodyum bisülfit, Sodyum hidrojen sülfit
vi: E222, Natri bisunfit
zh: E222, 亚硫酸氢钠

en: E223, Sodium metabisulphite, Pyrosulphite, Sodium metabisulfite, Pyrosulfite
xx: E223
ar: E223, بيروكبريتيت الصوديوم
bg: E223, Натриев метабисулфит, Пиросулфит
ca: E223, Metabisulfit de sodi, metabisulfit sòdic
cs: E223, Disiřičitan sodný, Disiřičitan disodný, pyrosiřičitan
da: E223, Natriumdisulfit, Pyrosulfit
de: E223, Natriummetabisulfit, Pyrosulfit, Natriumdisulfit
el: E223, Μεταδιθειωδες νατριο
eo: E223, Natria pirosulfito
es: E223, Metabisulfito sódico, Pirosulfito, Metabisulfito de sodio, Disulfito de sodio, disulfito sodico
et: E223, Naatriumdisulfit, Naatriumpürosulfit
fa: E223, سدیم متابی‌سولفیت
fi: E223, Natriumdisulfiitti, Natriummetabisulfiitti, Pyrosulfiitti, Natriumpyrosulfiitti, Natriumdisulfiittia, Natriummetabisulfiittia, Pyrosulfiittia, Natriumpyrosulfiittia
fr: E223, Disulfite de sodium, métabisulfite de sodium, Pyrosulfite, disulfites de sodium, metabisulfite de sodium e223
hr: E223, natrijev metabisulfit, natrijev metabisulfite e223
hu: E223, Nátrium-metabiszulfit, Piroszulfit
hy: E223, Նատրիումի պիրոսուլֆիտ
id: E223, Natrium metabisulfit
it: E223, Metabisolfito di sodio, Pirosolfito
ja: E223, ピロ亜硫酸ナトリウム, ピロ亜硫酸Na, ピロ亜硫酸Ｎａ
lt: E223, Natrio metabisulfitas, Pirosulfitas
lv: E223, Nātrija metabisulfīts, Pirosulfīts
mt: E223, Metabisulfit tas-sodju, Pirosulfit
nl: E223, Natriumdisulfiet, Natriummetabisulfiet, pyrosulfiet
pl: E223, Pirosiarczyn sodu
pt: E223, Metabissulfito de sódio, Pirossulfito
ro: E223, Metabisulfit de sodiu, Pirosulfit
ru: E223, пиросульфит натрия
sh: E223, Natrijum metabisulfit
sk: E223, Disiričitan sodný, Pyrosiričitan
sl: E223, Natrijev metabisulfit, pirosulfit
sr: E223, Natrijum metabisulfit
sv: E223, Natriumdisulfit, Pyrosulfit, natriumpyrosulfit
tr: E223, Sodyum metabisulfit, Sodyum metabisülfit, Sodyum disülfit
vi: E223, Natri metabisunfit
zh: E223, 焦亚硫酸钠

en: E224, Potassium metabisulphite, Potassium metabisulfite
xx: E224
ar: E224, ميتابيسلفيت البوتاسيوم
bg: E224, Калиев метабисулфит
ca: E224, Metabisulfit de potassi, Metabisulfit potàssic
cs: E224, Disiřičitan draselný, Disiřičitan didraselný, Pyrosiřičitan draselný
da: E224, Kaliumdisulfit
de: E224, Kaliummetabisulfit, Kaliumdisulfit, K2S2O5, Dikaliumdisulfit, Kaliumpyrosulfit
el: E224, Μεταδιθειωδες καλιο
eo: E224, Kalia pirosulfito
es: E224, Metabisulfito potásico, Metabisulfito de potasio, Disulfito de potasio, Disulfito potásico, Pirosulfito de potasio
et: E224, Kaaliumdisulfit, Kaaliumpürosulfit
fa: E224, پتاسیم متابی‌سولفیت
fi: E224, Kaliumdisulfiitti, Kaliummetabisulfiitti, Kaliumdisulfiittia, Kaliummetabisulfiittia
fr: E224, Disulfite de potassium, Métabisulfite de potassium, Pyrosulfite de potassium, di sulfite de potassium
hr: E224, kalijev metabisulfit
hu: E224, Kálium-metabiszulfit
it: E224, Metabisolfito di potassio, Pirosolfito di potassio, Disolfito di potassio, Potassio metabisolfito
ja: E224, ピロ亜硫酸カリウム, 亜硫酸カリウム, 亜硫酸K, 亜硫酸Ｋ, 重亜硫酸カリウム, 重亜硫酸K, 重亜硫酸Ｋ
lt: E224, Kalio metabisulfitas
lv: E224, Kālija metabisulfīts
mt: E224, Metabisulfit tal-potassju
nl: E224, Kaliumdisulfiet, Kaliummetabisulfiet
pl: E224, Pirosiarczyn potasu, Metadisiarczek potasu
pt: E224, Metabissulfito de potássio
ro: E224, Metabisulfit de potasiu
ru: E224, Пиросульфит калия, дисульфит калия
sh: E224, Kalijum metabisulfit
sk: E224
sl: E224, Kalijev metabisulfit
sr: E224, Kalijum metabisulfit
sv: E224, Kaliumdisulfit, Kaliumpyrosulfit
vi: E224, Kali metabisunfit